Utah statutes.
35A-8-425.   Powers of public body aiding in project.

(1)  For the purpose of aiding and cooperating in the planning, undertaking, construction, or operation of projects located within its jurisdiction, a public body may, with or without consideration:

(a)  dedicate, sell, convey, or lease any of its interest in property, or grant easements, licenses, or other rights or privileges to a housing authority or the federal government;

(b)  cause parks, playgrounds, recreational, community, educational, water, sewer, or drainage facilities, or other works that it is otherwise empowered to undertake to be furnished adjacent to or in connection with these projects;

(c)  furnish, dedicate, close, pave, install, grade, regrade, plan or replan streets, roads, roadways, alleys, sidewalks, or other places that it is otherwise empowered to undertake;

(d)  plan or replan, zone or rezone any parts of the public body, make exceptions from building regulations and ordinances, and make changes in its map;

(e)  cause the same services to be furnished to a housing authority that the public body may furnish, and provide facilities and services, including feeding facilities and services for tenants, in connection with housing projects;

(f)  enter into agreements with respect to the exercise by the public body of its powers relating to the repair, improvement, condemnation, closing, or demolition of unsafe, insanitary, or unfit buildings;

(g)  notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, use any money belonging to or within the control of the public body, including money derived from the sale or furnishing of property or facilities to a housing authority, in the purchase of the bonds or other obligations of a housing authority and exercise any related rights;

(h)  do any and all things necessary or convenient to aid and cooperate in the planning, undertaking, construction, or operation of any projects;

(i)  incur the entire expense of public improvements made by a public body in exercising the powers granted in this part; and

(j)  enter into agreements, that may extend over any period notwithstanding any provision or rule of law to the contrary, with a housing authority respecting action to be taken by a public body under any of the powers granted by this part.

(2)  If title to or possession of a project is held by a public governmental agency authorized by law to engage in the development or administration of low-rent housing or slum clearance projects, including an agency or instrumentality of the United States, the provisions of the agreements entered into under Subsection (1)(j) inure to the benefit of and may be enforced by that public body or governmental agency.

(3) A sale, conveyance, lease, or agreement provided for in this section may be made by a public body without appraisal, public notice, advertisement, or public bidding, notwithstanding any other laws to the contrary.

